guesser/guess.nouns.lexd
#-----------NOUNS-----------

PATTERN Noun

NounAbsSgLex [<n>:] [<abs.sg>:] DeclType[n] Particles

NounOblSgLex [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.sg>:] (Case[-pl] | Locatives) > Particles
NounOblSgLex[1] [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.sg>:] Case[gen,cl] > Particles
NounOblSgLex[-1] [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.sg>:] Case[gen,-cl] > Particles

NounAbsPlLex [<n>:] DeclType[n] AbsPlSuf > Particles

NounOblPlLex [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.pl>:] (Case[-sg] | Locatives) > Particles
NounOblPlLex[1] [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.pl>:] Case[gen,cl] > Particles
NounOblPlLex[-1] [<n>:] DeclType[n] [<obl.pl>:] Case[gen,-cl] > Particles


LEXICON Case
<erg>:ди[erg]
<dat>:й[dat]
<dat>:лъу[dat]
<dat>:лълъий[dat]
<gen>:лІи[gen]
<gen>:лІол[gen]
<cl><gen>:в[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:й[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:б[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:р[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:вул[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:йил[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:бул[gen,cl]
<cl><gen>:рул[gen,cl]
<cl><aff>:во[aff]
<cl><aff>:йо[aff]
<cl><aff>:бо[aff]
<cl><aff>:ро[aff]
<ins>:хъи

LEXICON Locatives
<sub>:кьи
<sub><el>:кьикку
<sup.ess>:ла
<sup.lat>:ло
<sup><el>:лакку
<in.ess>:ла[sg]
<ess>:у[sg]
<in.lat>:ло[sg]
<lat>:ди[sg]
<in><el>:лакку[sg]
<inter>:лІи
<inter><el>:лІикку
<apud.ess>:ха
<apud.lat>:хо
<apud><el>:хакку
<cont>:чІу
<cont><el>:чІукку
<loc>:хъи[pl]
<loc>:хъи[pl]
<loc><el>:хъикку[pl]
<in>:у[sg]
<in>:у[sg]
<in><el>:укку[sg]

LEXICON AbsPlSuf
<abs.pl>:л[л]
<abs.pl>:ил[ил]
<abs.pl>:ул[ул]
<abs.pl>:ол[ол]
<abs.pl>:лил[лил]
